Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska17-961
Facility; acquisition or construction; management; facility, defined.

Cities of the second class and villages are hereby authorized and empowered to (1) accept a gift or devise of or to purchase a facility or a building suitable for conversion into a facility, (2) purchase real estate and erect a building or buildings thereon for the purpose of establishing a facility, and (3) maintain, manage, improve, remodel, equip, and operate a facility.

For purposes of sections 17-961 to 17-966, facility shall mean a municipal hospital, a medical clinic, a nursing home, or multiunit housing.

Laws 1945, c. 31, § 1, p. 149;

Laws 1957, c. 36, § 1, p. 200;

Laws 1965, c. 72, § 1, p. 293;

Laws 1992, LB 1240, § 14.